California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(5) If applicable, a disclosure that “Environmental, Olympic, special interest, or other license plates issued pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 5000), Article 8.4 (commencing with Section 5060) or Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 5100) of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code that remain the personal effects of the debtor will be removed from the collateral and inventoried, and that if the plates are not claimed by the debtor within 60 days, they will be destroyed.”

(6) A disclosure of the charges payable by the debtor to the repossession agency for the
 storage of the collateral and personal effects from the date of repossession until release of the property from storage.

(b) The notice under subdivision (a) may be given by regular mail addressed to the current address of the debtor, if known, or by personal service, at the option of the repossession agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 5.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.11.

Any written report to a client shall be submitted by the licensee, the qualified certificate holder, or a person authorized by one or either of them, and the person submitting the report shall exercise diligence in ascertaining whether or not the facts and information in the report are true and correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.115.

(a) A licensee shall not appraise or determine the value of any collateral, whether damaged or not.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a licensee may complete a condition report that makes a general assessment of the collateral.

(2) A condition report does not include all damage or missing parts.

(3) A condition report shall include the following statement: “In accordance with Section 7507.115 of the Business and Professions Code, this condition report is a general assessment of the collateral and does not include all damage or
 missing parts.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 740, Sec. 6.   (AB 281)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.12.

(a) With regard to collateral subject to registration under the Vehicle Code, a repossession is complete if any of the following occurs:

(1) The repossessor gains entry to the collateral.

(2) The collateral becomes connected to a tow truck or the repossessor’s tow vehicle, as those terms are defined in Section 615 of the Vehicle Code.

(3) The repossessor moves the entire collateral present.

(4) The repossessor gains control of the collateral.

(b) No person other than
 the legal owner may direct a repossessor to release a vehicle without legal authority to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 340, Sec. 4.   (AB 791)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.125.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits the using or taking of personal effects that are connected, adjoined, or affixed to the collateral through an unbroken sequence, if that use or taking is reasonably necessary to effectuate the recovery in a safe manner or to protect the collateral or personal effects. Nothing in this chapter prohibits the removal of a locking mechanism or security device on the collateral, before, during, or after a repossession. No storage fee shall be charged for the first week on any personal effects used to effectuate a recovery pursuant to this section. Any personal effects used or taken pursuant to this section shall be processed in a reasonably expedient manner pursuant to Sections 7507.9 and 7507.10.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7505.2 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 390, Sec. 3.   (AB 2503)   Effective September 17, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.13.

(a) A licensed repossession agency is not liable for the act or omission of a legal owner, debt collector, debtor, lienholder, lessor, lessee, or registered owner, or an agent of any of them, in making an assignment or repossession order to it or for accepting an assignment or repossession order from any legal owner, debt collector, debtor,
 lienholder, lessor, lessee, or registered owner, or an agent of any of them, and is entitled to indemnity from the legal owner, debt collector, debtor, lienholder, lessor, lessee, or registered owner for any loss, damage, cost, or expense, including court costs and attorney’s fees, that it may reasonably incur as a result thereof. Nothing in this subdivision limits the liability of any person for his or her tortious conduct.

(b) The legal owner, debt collector, debtor, lienholder, lessor, lessee, or registered owner, or the agent of any of them, is not liable for any act or omission by a licensed repossession agency, or its agent, in carrying out
 an assignment or repossession order and is entitled to indemnity from the repossession agency for any loss, damage, cost, or expense, including court costs and attorney’s fees, that the legal owner, debt collector, debtor, lienholder, lessor, lessee, or registered owner, or the agent of any of them, may reasonably incur as a result thereof. Nothing in this subdivision limits the liability of any person for his or her tortious conduct.

(c) The legal owner, debtor, lienholder, lessor, lessee, or registered owner, or the agent of any of them, is not guilty of a violation of Section 7502.1 or 7502.2 if, at the time of the
 assignment or repossession order, the party making the assignment or repossession order has in its possession a copy of the repossessor’s current, unexpired repossession agency license, and a copy of the current, unexpired repossession agency’s qualified manager’s certificate, and does not have actual knowledge of any order of suspension or revocation of the license or certificate.

(d) Neither a licensed repossession agency nor a legal owner, debtor, lienholder, lessor, lessee, or registered owner, or an agent of any of them may, by any means, direct or indirect, express or implied, instruct or attempt to coerce the other to violate any law, regulation, or rule regarding the recovery of any
 collateral, including, but not limited to, the provisions of this chapter or Section 9609 of the Commercial Code.

(e) A licensed repossession agency, at least annually, on or before January 31 of each year, shall provide a legal owner from which the agency accepts an assignment or repossession order with a copy of this section, Sections 7500.2, 7507.4, 7507.115, 7507.12, and 7507.125 of this code, and Section 28 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 509, Sec. 4.   (AB 1859)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Prohibited Acts and Citations [7508. - 7509.3.]

7508.

The director may assess administrative fines against any repossession agency licensee, qualified certificate holder, or registrant for any of the prohibited acts outlined in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7508.1.

The director may assess administrative fines for the following prohibited acts:

(a) Knowingly making any false report to his or her employer or client for whom information was being obtained. The fine shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation and five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation thereafter.

(b) Using any identification to indicate registration as a repossessor, other than the bureau-issued registration card, except an employer identification card issued by the repossession agency which has met bureau approval, or a badge, cap insignia, or jacket patch as provided in Section 7508.8. A bureau-issued registration card shall be carried by those
 individuals specified by Section 7506.3, and shall be shown on demand to any bureau employee or law enforcement officer. The fine shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation.

(c) Using a business name other than the name under which the license is issued in connection with the official activities of the licensee’s business. The bureau shall issue a notice of warning for a first violation, a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for the second violation, and a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each violation thereafter.

(d) Appearing as an assignee party in any court proceeding involving claim and delivery, replevin, or other possessory court action, action to foreclose a chattel mortgage, mechanic’s lien, materialman’s lien, or any other lien. This section shall not prohibit a licensee from appearing as a defendant in any of the preceding actions. The
 fine shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 4.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7508.2.

The director may assess administrative fines for any of the following prohibited acts:

(a) Recovering collateral or making any money demand in lieu thereof, including, but not limited to, collateral registered under the Vehicle Code, that has been sold under a security agreement before a signed or telegraphic authorization has been received from the legal owner, debtor, lienholder, lessor, or repossession agency acting on behalf of the legal owner, debtor, lienholder, or lessor of the collateral. A telephonic assignment is acceptable if the legal owner, debtor, lienholder, lessor, or repossession agency acting on behalf of the legal owner, debtor, lienholder, or lessor is known to the licensee and a written authorization from the legal owner,
 debtor, lienholder, lessor, or repossession agency acting on behalf of the legal owner, debtor, lienholder, or lessor is received by the licensee within 10 working days or a request by the licensee for a written authorization from the legal owner, debtor, lienholder, lessor, or repossession agency acting on behalf of the legal owner, debtor, lienholder, or lessor is made in writing within 10 working days. Referrals of assignments from one licensee to another licensee are acceptable. The referral of an assignment shall be made under the same terms and conditions as in the original assignment. The fine shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation and five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation thereafter, per audit.

(b) Using collateral or personal effects, which have been recovered, for the personal benefit of a licensee, or officer, partner, manager, registrant, or employee of a licensee. The fine shall be two hundred fifty
 dollars ($250) for the first violation and a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation thereafter. This subdivision does not apply to personal effects disposed of pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 7507.9. Nothing in this subdivision prohibits the using or taking of personal property connected, adjoined, or affixed to the collateral through an unbroken sequence if that use or taking is reasonably necessary to effectuate the recovery in a safe manner or to protect the collateral or personal effects.

(c) Selling collateral recovered under this chapter, or making a demand for payment in lieu of repossession. The fine shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the first violation and a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each subsequent violation.

(d) Unlawfully entering any private building or secured area without the consent of the
 owner, or of the person in legal possession thereof, at the time of repossession. The fine shall be five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.

(e) Committing unlawful assault or battery on another person during the course of a repossession. The fine shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation.

(f) Falsification of an inventory. The fine shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation and two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each violation thereafter.

(g) Soliciting from the legal owner the recovery of specific collateral registered under the Vehicle Code or under the motor vehicle licensing laws of other states after the collateral has been seen or located on a public street or on public or private property without divulging the location of the vehicle. The fine
 shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation and two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each violation thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 5.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7508.3.

A licensee, or any of his or her registrants or employees, or a qualified certificate holder, is prohibited from using any false or misleading representation during the course of recovery of collateral. The bureau shall issue a notice of warning for a first violation, a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for the second violation, and a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for any subsequent violation of any of the following:

(a) The false representation or implication that the individual is vouched for, bonded by, or affiliated with the United States or with any state, county, city, or city and county, including the use of any badge, uniform, or facsimile thereof.

(b) The false representation or implication that any individual is an attorney or that any communication is from any attorney.

(c) The representation or implication by a repossession agency or its registrants or employees that nonpayment of any debt will result in the arrest or imprisonment of any person or the seizure, garnishment, attachment, or sale of any property or wages of any person, unless the action is lawful and the creditor has instructed the repossession agency to inform the debtor that the creditor intends to take the action.

(d) The threat to take any action that cannot legally be taken.

(e) The false representation or implication that the debtor committed any crime or other conduct in order to disgrace the debtor.

(f) The use or distribution of any written communication which simulates or is falsely represented to be a document authorized, issued, or approved by any court, official, or agency of the United States or any state, or which creates a false impression as to its source, authorization, or approval.

(g) The false representation or implication that documents are legal process.

(h) The use of any business, company, or organization name other than the true name of the repossession agency’s business, company, or organization.

(i) The use of any deceptive forms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 6.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7508.4.

The director may assess administrative fines for any of the following prohibited acts:

(a) Conducting business from any location other than that location to which a license was issued or conducting a business as an individual, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation unless the licensee holds a valid license issued to that exact same individual, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation. The fine shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

(b) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed repossessor or assigning his or her license. “Assigning his or her license” means that no licensee shall permit a registrant, employee, or agent in his or her own
 name to advertise, engage clients, furnish reports, or present bills to clients, or in any manner whatsoever to conduct business for which a license is required under this chapter. The fine shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

(c) Failing to register registrants within 15 days. The fine shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each of the first two violations and one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation thereafter.

(d) Employing a person whose registration has expired or been revoked, denied, suspended, or canceled, if the bureau has furnished a listing of these persons to the licensee. The fine shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for the first violation and a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation thereafter.

(e) Failing to notify the bureau,
 within 30 days, of any change in officers. A notice of warning shall be issued for the first violation. Thereafter, the fine shall be five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.

(f) Failing to submit the notices regarding a violent act or threatened violent act within seven days pursuant to Section 7507.6 or to submit a copy of a judgment awarded against the licensee for an amount of more than the then prevailing maximum claim that may be brought in small claims court within seven days pursuant to Section 7507.7. The fine shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for the first violation and shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation thereafter.

(g) Failing to include the licensee’s name, address, and license number in any advertisement. The fine shall be fifty dollars ($50) for each violation.

(h) Failing to maintain personal effects for at least 60 days. The fine shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation and two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each violation thereafter.

(i) Failing to provide a personal effects list or a notice of seizure within the time limits set forth in Section 7507.9 or 7507.10. The fine shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation and two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each violation thereafter.

(j) Failing to file the required report pursuant to Section 28 of the Vehicle Code. The fine shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation and two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each violation thereafter, per audit.

(k) Failing to maintain an accurate record and accounting of secure temporary registration forms. The qualified
 certificate holder shall be fined two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the first violation, fined an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for the second violation, and fined an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) plus a one-year suspension of the privilege to issue temporary registrations pursuant to Section 7506.9 for the third and subsequent violations.

(l) Representing that a licensee has an office and conducts business at a specific address when that is not the case. The fine shall be five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation.

(m) Notwithstanding any other law, the money in the Private Security Services Fund that is attributable to administrative fines imposed pursuant to this section shall not be continuously appropriated and shall be available for expenditure only upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 7.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7508.5.

The director may assess administrative fines against a repossession agency registrant for the following acts, in addition to fines imposed pursuant to any other section in this article. The fine shall be twenty-five dollars ($25) for each of the following violations:

(a) Knowingly submit a false report.

(b) Submitting a report to a client without authorization by his or her employer.

(c) Failing to carry a bureau-issued identification card and failing to show that card upon demand to a bureau employee or a law enforcement officer.

(d) Failing to register.

(e) Failing to return his or her registration card to the employer upon termination.

(f) Failing to report a violent act involving the registrant to the licensee or the licensee’s qualified certificate holder within 24 hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 390, Sec. 7.   (AB 2503)   Effective September 17, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7508.6.

The director may assess administrative fines against any repossession agency licensee, qualified certificate holder, or registrant for failure to notify the bureau within 30 days of any change of residence or business address. The fine shall be fifty dollars ($50) for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 8.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7508.7.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, a repossession agency shall not disclose to the public, any person other than the individual to whom the information pertains, or any nongovernmental entity, without a court order, the residence address, residence telephone number, cellular telephone number, driver’s license number, work schedule, past, present, or future location, or any other personal information of any licensee, registrant, qualified certificate holder, qualified manager, employee, or independent contractor the agency employs.

(b) For the purpose of verifying information for the issuance or renewal of a policy of insurance, a repossession agency may provide to an insurance company the name, driver’s license number, and date of birth of a licensee, registrant, qualified certificate holder, qualified manager, employee, or independent contractor the agency employs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 740, Sec. 8.   (AB 281)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7508.8.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 7508.3, an oval, shield, round, square, or non-seven-point badge, cap insignia, or jacket patch may be worn by a licensee, officer, director, partner, manager, independent contractor, qualified certificate holder, qualified manager, or employee of a repossession agency. If a badge, cap insignia, or jacket patch is worn, it shall bear on its face all of the following:

(1) All or a substantial part of the repossession agency’s name.

(2) The repossession agency license number issued by the director to that individual or agency.

(3) The word
 “repossessor.”

(b) A repossessor shall not wear a badge on his or her belt or hang a badge around his or her neck.

(c) All badges, cap insignias, and jacket patches worn by a repossessor shall be a standard design approved by the director and shall be clearly visible.

(d) This section shall not apply to a holder of a temporary registration pursuant to Section 7506.9.

(e) The director may assess a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation, one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) for the second violation, and two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each subsequent violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 340, Sec. 7.   (AB 791)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7509.

(a) (1) A licensee, certificate holder, or registrant under this chapter may request a review by the Collateral Recovery Disciplinary Review Committee, as established in Section 7509.1, to contest the assessment of an administrative fine or to appeal a
 denial, revocation, or suspension, unless the denial, revocation, or suspension is ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) A request for a review shall be by written notice to the disciplinary review committee within 30 days of the issuance of the citation and assessment or
 denial, revocation, or suspension.

(3) Following a review by the disciplinary review committee, the appellant shall be notified within 30 days, in writing, by regular mail, of the committee’s decision.

(4) If the appellant disagrees with the decision made by the disciplinary review committee, he or she may request a hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. A request for a hearing following a decision by the disciplinary review committee shall be by written notice to the bureau within 30 days of the committee’s decision.

(5) If the appellant does not request a hearing within 30 days, the disciplinary review committee’s decision shall become final.

(b) (1) A
 licensee, certificate holder, or registrant may request a hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code if he or she contests the assessment of an administrative fine, or to appeal a denial, revocation, or suspension. A hearing may also be requested if the appellant disagrees with the decision made by the disciplinary review committee.

(2) A request for a hearing shall be by written notice to the bureau within 30 days of the issuance of the decision by the disciplinary review committee. A hearing pursuant to this subdivision shall be available only after a review by the disciplinary review committee.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 740, Sec. 9.   (AB 281)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7509.1.

(a) On or before July 1, 2017, the Governor shall appoint a Collateral Recovery Disciplinary Review Committee, and may remove any member of the committee for misconduct, incompetency, or neglect of duty. The committee shall consist of five members. Of the five members, three members shall be actively engaged in business as a licensed repossession agency and two members shall be public members. None of the public members shall be licensees, certificate holders, or registrants, or engaged in any business or profession in which any part of the fees, compensation, or revenue thereof is derived from any licensee.

(b) The disciplinary review committee shall meet
 every 60 days or more or less frequently as may be required. The members shall be paid per diem pursuant to Section 103 and shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses. The members shall be appointed for a term of four years.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 740, Sec. 10.   (AB 281)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7509.2.

(a) The Collateral Recovery Disciplinary Review Committee shall perform the following functions:

(1) Affirm, rescind, or modify all decisions concerning administrative fines assessed by the director or bureau against repossession agencies or their employees, that are appealed to the committee.

(2) Affirm, rescind, or modify all
 decisions concerning denial of licenses issued by the director or bureau, except denials or suspensions ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, that are appealed to the committee.

(b) The Collateral Recovery Disciplinary Review Committee may grant a probationary license, certificate, registration, or permit with respect to the appealed decisions described in subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 740, Sec. 11.   (AB 281)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7509.3.

(a) The bureau shall provide the Collateral Recovery Disciplinary Review Committee all evidence used by the bureau in reaching its decision prior to any review or appeal of that decision by the committee.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 740, Sec. 12.   (AB 281)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Disciplinary Proceedings [7510. - 7510.4.]

7510.

Except as otherwise required to comply with the provisions of this chapter, the proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7510.1.

In addition to any other remedies authorized by this chapter, the director may suspend or revoke a repossession agency license, a qualification certificate, or registration issued under this chapter if the director determines that the licensee or the licensee’s manager, if an individual, or if the licensee is a person other than an individual, that any of its officers, partners, registrants, employees, or its manager, has:

(a) Made any false statement or given any false information in connection with an application for a license, qualification certificate, or registration, or a renewal or reinstatement thereof.

(b) Violated any provisions of this chapter.

(c) Violated any rule of the director adopted pursuant to authority contained in this chapter.

(d) Been convicted of a felony or any crime substantially related to the repossession agency business including illegally using, carrying, or possessing a deadly weapon.

(e) Committed or permitted any registrant or employee to commit any act while the license was expired which would be cause for the suspension or revocation of a license, or grounds for the denial of an application for a license.

(f) Unlawfully committed assault, battery, or kidnapping, or used force or violence on any person.

(g) Knowingly violated, or advised, encouraged, or assisted the violation of any court order or injunction in the course of business as a licensee.

(h) Been convicted of a violation of Section 148 of the Penal Code, resisting or obstructing a public officer.

(i) Committed any act which is a ground for denial of an application for license under this chapter.

(j) Committed any act prohibited by Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 630) of Title 15 of Part 1 of the Penal Code.

(k) Committed any act in the course of the licensee’s business constituting dishonesty or fraud, including, but not limited to:

(1) Knowingly making a false statement relating to evidence or information obtained in the course of employment or while under contract, or knowingly publishing a slander or a libel in the course of business.

(2) Using illegal means in the collection or attempted collection of a debt or obligation.

(l) Represented that the licensee has an office and conducts business at a specific address when that is not the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 402, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7510.2.

(a) Any licensee, or any officer, partner, registrant, employee, or manager of a licensee, who is found by the director to have committed any acts prohibited by Section 7510.1, resulting in revocation of a license, shall dispose of any financial interest in any repossession agency required to be licensed by this act within 90 days of the effective date of the revocation, or at a later date, approved in writing by the director, not to exceed 180 days.

(b) No licensee, or any officer, partner, registrant, employee, or manager of a licensee, who is found by the director to have committed any acts prohibited by Section 7510.1, shall, during the period of suspension or revocation, acquire any financial interest in any repossession agency required to be licensed by this act.

(c) The requirements and prohibitions of this section shall also apply to any immediate family member of a licensee, or officer, partner, registrant, employee, or manager of a licensee, if the family member actively participated in the management or operation of the repossession agency whose license was revoked.

(d) Any immediate family member of a licensee, or officer, partner, registrant, employee, or manager of a licensee, not subject to subdivision (c), shall dispose of all financial interest in the repossession agency of the licensee whose license was revoked, within the time period required in subdivision (a).

(e) Any financial interest transferred for the purpose of avoiding the prohibitions of this section shall be deemed a financial interest of the transferor.

(f) As used in this section, “financial interest” includes, but is not limited to, any type of ownership interest, debt, loan, lease, compensation, remuneration, discount, rebate, refund, dividend, distribution, subsidy, or other form of direct or indirect payment, whether in money or otherwise.

(g) As used in this section, “immediate family” includes one’s spouse, children, parents, siblings, and spouses of one’s children or siblings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 505, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7510.3.

Notwithstanding any other law, the failure of any person licensed to do business as a corporation or limited liability company in this state to be registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State and the Franchise Tax Board after notice from the bureau shall result in the automatic suspension of the licensee by operation of law. The bureau shall notify the licensee in writing of its failure to be registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State or Franchise Tax Board, or both, and that the licensee shall be suspended 30 days from the date of the notice if the licensee does not provide proof satisfactory to the bureau that it is properly registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State or Franchise Tax Board, or both. Reinstatement may be made at any time following the suspension by providing
 proof satisfactory to the bureau that the license is properly registered and in good standing and the payment of the reinstatement fee as prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 7.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7510.4.

The record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof, shall be conclusive evidence of such conviction.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The director may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Revenue [7511. - 7511.]

7511.

The bureau shall establish and assess fees and penalties for licensure and registration as displayed in this section. The fees prescribed by this chapter are as follows:

(a) The application fee for an original repossession agency license shall be at least nine hundred seventy dollars ($970) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed one thousand sixty-seven dollars ($1,067).

(b) The application fee for an original qualified manager certificate shall be at least three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed three hundred eighty-five dollars ($385).

(c) The renewal fee for a repossession agency license shall be at
 least seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed eight hundred twenty-five dollars ($825) biennially.

(d) The renewal fee for a qualified manager certificate shall be at least two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed two hundred forty-eight dollars ($248) biennially.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 163.5, the reinstatement fee for a repossession agency license required pursuant to Sections 7503.11 and 7505.3 is the amount equal to the renewal fee plus a penalty of 50 percent thereof.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 163.5, the reinstatement fee for a qualified manager certificate required pursuant to Sections 7503.11 and 7504.7 is the amount equal to the renewal fee plus a penalty of 50 percent thereof.

(g) A fee for reexamination of an applicant for a qualified manager shall be at least sixty dollars ($60) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed sixty-six dollars ($66).

(h) An initial registrant registration fee shall be at least seventy-five dollars ($75) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed eighty-two dollars ($82), a registrant reregistration fee shall be at least seventy-five dollars ($75) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed eighty-two dollars ($82), and a registrant biennial renewal fee shall be at least forty dollars ($40) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed forty-four dollars ($44) per registration. Notwithstanding Section 163.5 and this subdivision, the reregistration fee for a registrant whose registration expired more than one year prior to the filing of the application for reregistration shall be at least seventy-five dollars
 ($75) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed eighty-two dollars ($82).

(i) The delinquency fee is 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of expiration, but not less than twenty-five dollars ($25).

(j) The fingerprint processing fee is that amount charged to the bureau by the Department of Justice.

(k) The director shall furnish one copy of any issue or edition of the licensing law and rules and regulations to any applicant or licensee without charge. The director shall charge and collect a fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10) plus sales tax for each additional copy, which may be furnished on request to any applicant or licensee, and for each copy furnished on request to any other person.

(l) The processing fee for the assignment of
 a repossession agency license pursuant to Section 7503.9 shall be at least four hundred dollars ($400) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed four hundred forty dollars ($440).

(m) The fee for an endorsed verification of licensure, certification, or registration shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). The verification document shall include the license, certificate, or registration number, the license, certificate, or registration history and current status, the date of the endorsement, an embossed seal, and the signature of the chief.

(n) The fee for the replacement of a lost or destroyed registration card, license, or certificate authorized by this chapter shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). The request for a replacement of a registration card, license, or certificate shall be made in the manner prescribed by the bureau.

(o) The reinstatement fee following a suspension pursuant to Section 7510.3 shall be 25 percent of the renewal fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 8.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Review [7511.5. - 7511.5.]

7511.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the bureau, as set forth in this chapter, shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this chapter were scheduled to be repealed as of January 1, 2029.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 6.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11.3. Private Investigators [7512. - 7573.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [7512. - 7514.]

7512.

This chapter may be cited as the Private Investigator Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.1.

As used in this chapter, “director” means the Director of Consumer Affairs, unless the context indicates otherwise.
